Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-102.01
County veterans service committee; acceptance of gifts, devises, and bequests.

The county veterans service committee shall have power to accept gifts, devises, and bequests of real and personal property to carry out the purposes for which such county veterans service committee was established and to the extent of the powers conferred upon such committee by this section and sections 80-101 and 80-102.

Laws 1947, c. 305, § 4, p. 925;

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 58.